Georgia statutes. 
Use of municipal automobile as a corporate or as a governmental function, 110 A.L.R. 1117; 156 A.L.R. 714.

Liability of municipality for damage to person or property due to hydrant, 113 A.L.R. 661.

Municipal corporation or other governmental unit as within term "corporation," "person," or other term employed in death statute descriptive of parties against whom the action may be maintained, 115 A.L.R. 1287.

Liability of public officer in respect of public money paid out in reliance upon unconstitutional statute, 118 A.L.R. 787.

Liability of municipality for enforcement of an unconstitutional or void ordinance, 118 A.L.R. 1054.

Municipal immunity from liability for torts, 120 A.L.R. 1376; 60 A.L.R.2d 1198.

Constitutionality of statute which relieves municipality from liability for torts, 124 A.L.R. 350.

Lease by municipality of property intended for use and benefit of public as affecting its duty and responsibility in respect of the manner and conditions of operation and maintenance of the property by the lessee, 129 A.L.R. 1163.

Tort liability of municipality or other governmental subdivision in connection with poor relief activities, 134 A.L.R. 762.

Liability for injury to person or damage to property as result of "blackout," 136 A.L.R. 1327; 147 A.L.R. 1442; 148 A.L.R. 1401; 150 A.L.R. 1448; 153 A.L.R. 1433; 154 A.L.R. 1459; 155 A.L.R. 1458; 158 A.L.R. 1463.

Immunity of municipality from liability for torts in exercise of governmental functions as applicable to torts outside municipal limits, 140 A.L.R. 1058.

Collection and disposal of garbage and rubbish as governmental or private function as regards municipal immunity from liability for tort, 156 A.L.R. 714.

Abrogation of state's immunity from liability or suit as affecting immunity of municipality or other governmental unit, 161 A.L.R. 367.

Remedy available against invalid judgment in favor of United States, state, or other governmental unit immune to suit, 163 A.L.R. 244.

Liability of municipality for fire loss due to its failure to provide or maintain adequate water supply or pressure, 163 A.L.R. 348.

Municipal liability for injury to voter in consequence of condition of polling place, 164 A.L.R. 472.

Effect of statute permitting state to be sued upon the question of its liability for negligence or tort, 169 A.L.R. 105.

Liability of municipal corporation for damage to property resulting from inadequacy of drains and sewers due to defects in plan, 173 A.L.R. 1031.

Tortious breach of contract as within consent to suit against United States or state on contract, 1 A.L.R.2d 864.

Liability of municipality or other governmental subdivision in connection with flood-protection measures, 5 A.L.R.2d 57.

Municipality's duty and liability with respect to excavation made by abutting owner to connect his property with service mains in street, 13 A.L.R.2d 922.

Liability of municipality for damage caused by fall of tree or limb, 14 A.L.R.2d 186.

Liability of municipality for injury or damage from explosion or burning of substance stored by third person under municipal permit, 17 A.L.R.2d 683.

Recovery of interest on claim against a governmental unit in absence of provision in contract or express statutory provision, 24 A.L.R.2d 928.

Immunity from liability for damages in tort of state or governmental unit or agency in operating hospital, 25 A.L.R.2d 203; 18 A.L.R.4th 858.

Tort liability of governmental unit for injury or damage resulting from insecticide and vermin eradication operations, 25 A.L.R.2d 1057.

Operation of garage for maintenance and repair of municipal vehicles as governmental function, 26 A.L.R.2d 944.

Tort liability of municipality or other governmental unit in connection with destruction of weeds and the like, 34 A.L.R.2d 1210.

Liability of municipality in damages for its refusal to grant permit, license, or franchise, 37 A.L.R.2d 694.

State's immunity from tort liability as dependent on governmental or proprietary nature of function, 40 A.L.R.2d 927.

Maintenance of auditorium, community recreational center building, or the like, by municipal corporation as governmental or proprietary function for purposes of tort liability, 47 A.L.R.2d 544.

Liability of municipality for injuries resulting from fall or slipping on debris or litter on outdoor stairway, 47 A.L.R.2d 1086.

Death action against municipal corporation as subject to statute of limitations governing wrongful death actions or that governing actions against a municipality for injury to person or property, 53 A.L.R.2d 1068.

Municipal operation of bathing beach or swimming pool as governmental or proprietary function, for purposes of tort liability, 55 A.L.R.2d 1434.

Municipal operation of sewage disposal plant as governmental or proprietary function, for purposes of tort liability, 57 A.L.R.2d 1336.

Municipality's liability for damage resulting from obstruction or clogging of drains or sewers, 59 A.L.R.2d 281.

Municipality's liability arising from negligence or other wrongful act in carrying out construction or repair of sewers and drains, 61 A.L.R.2d 874.

Suability, and liability, for torts, of public housing authority, 61 A.L.R.2d 1246.

Liability of municipality for torts in connection with airport, 66 A.L.R.2d 634.

Civil liability of school officials for malicious prosecution, 66 A.L.R.2d 749.

Liability or indemnity insurance carried by governmental unit as affecting immunity from tort liability, 68 A.L.R.2d 1437.

Waiver of, or estoppel to rely upon, contractual limitation of time for bringing action against municipality or other political subdivision, 81 A.L.R.2d 1039.

Liability of municipality for injuries resulting from falling or slipping on defective outdoor stairway or steps, 92 A.L.R.2d 469.

Snow removal operations as within doctrine of governmental immunity from tort liability, 92 A.L.R.2d 796.

Right of contractor with federal, state, or local public body to latter's immunity from tort liability, 9 A.L.R.3d 382.

Modern status of doctrine of sovereign immunity as applied to public schools and institutions of higher learning, 33 A.L.R.3d 703.

Liability of municipality on quasi contract for value of property or work furnished without compliance with bidding requirements, 33 A.L.R.3d 1164.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for accident occurring during school athletic events, 35 A.L.R.3d 725.

Tort liability of public schools and institutions of higher learning for accidents associated with chemistry experiments, shopwork, and manual or vocational training, 35 A.L.R.3d 758.

Liability of prison authorities for injury to prisoner directly caused by assault by other prisoner, 41 A.L.R.3d 1021.

Liability of municipality or other governmental unit for failure to provide police protection, 46 A.L.R.3d 1084.

Attorney's mistake or neglect as excuse for failing to file timely notice of tort claim against state or local governmental unit, 55 A.L.R.3d 930.

Liability of governmental entity for issuance of permit for construction which caused or accelerated flooding, 62 A.L.R.3d 514.

Municipal corporation's safety rules or regulations as admissible in evidence in action by private party against municipal corporation or its officers or employees for negligent operation of vehicle, 82 A.L.R.3d 1285.

State or municipal liability for invasion of privacy, 87 A.L.R.3d 145.

Governmental tort liability for social service agency's negligence in placement, or supervision after placement, of children, 90 A.L.R.3d 1214.

Governmental liability from operation of zoo, 92 A.L.R.3d 832.

Recovery of exemplary or punitive damages from municipal corporation, 1 A.L.R.4th 448.

Liability of governmental unit or its officers for injury to innocent occupant of moving vehicle, or for damage to such vehicle, as result of police chase, 4 A.L.R.4th 865.

Liability of urban redevelopment authority or other state or municipal agency or entity for injuries occurring in vacant or abandoned property owned by governmental entity, 7 A.L.R.4th 1129.

Liability of governmental officer or entity for failure to warn or notify of release of potentially dangerous individual from custody, 12 A.L.R.4th 722.

Liability for wrongful autopsy, 18 A.L.R.4th 858.

Liability of governmental entity to builder or developer for negligent issuance of building permit subsequently suspended or revoked, 41 A.L.R.4th 99.

Right of insured, precluded from recovering against owner or operator of uninsured motor vehicle because of governmental immunity, to recover uninsured motorist benefits, 55 A.L.R.4th 806.

Municipal liability for negligent performance of building inspector's duties, 24 A.L.R.5th 200.

Liability of school or school personnel for injury to student resulting from cheerleader activities, 25 A.L.R.5th 784.

36-33-2. Liability for failure to perform discretionary act.

Statute text

Where municipal corporations are not required by statute to perform an act, they may not be held liable for exercising their discretion in failing to perform the act.

History

(Civil Code 1895, § 747; Civil Code 1910, § 896; Code 1933, § 69-302.)

Annotations

History of section. - This Code section is derived from the decision in Gaskins v. City of Atlanta, 73 Ga. 746 (1883).

Cross references. - Immunity of municipalities and officers or employees thereof for damages resulting from inspections or other actions taken or not taken pursuant to fire protection laws, § 25-2-38.1.

Liability of municipalities for defects in public roads, § 32-4-93.

Law reviews. - For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979).

For note, "Adverse Possession of Municipal and County Property Held for Proprietary Purposes: The Unique Georgia Development," see 7 Ga. St. B. J. 482 (1971).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Municipal corporation cannot be held liable for failure to perform duty when duty of performance has not been imposed upon the corporation by law, and which the corporation has no power to perform, for lack of authority to raise revenue for that purpose. Mayor of Montezuma v. Law, 1 Ga. App. 579, 57 S.E. 1025 (1907).

Clear line is drawn between a discretionary nonfeasance and the negligent maintenance of something erected by the city in the city's discretion in such manner as to create a dangerous nuisance, and which amounts to misfeasance. In a case of discretionary nonfeasance on the part of the defendant city, the defendant city is not liable. Tamas v. City of Columbus, 244 Ga. 200, 259 S.E.2d 457 (1979).

School crossing guard - O.C.G.A. § 36-33-2 may not be applicable when a city fails to provide a substitute school crossing guard at an intersection which was normally attended by a crossing guard, even though the city was not required by statute to provide a crossing guard. Whiddon v. O'Neal, 171 Ga. App. 636, 320 S.E.2d 601 (1984).

Whether a city will open a street is discretionary with the city, and the exercise of the city's discretion, one way or the other, gives no right of action to anyone who may have miscalculated the final action of the city. Pittman v. City of Jesup, 232 Ga. 635, 208 S.E.2d 456 (1974).

Failure to identify school safety crossings. - City did not create a nuisance by failing to identify school safety crossings across a public roadway in front of a school. McLaughlin v. City of Roswell, 161 Ga. App. 759, 289 S.E.2d 18 (1982).

Failure to erect traffic light. - In the absence of a law or ordinance requiring the defendant to erect a traffic light at an intersection as a result of which the plaintiff was allegedly injured, the erection and maintenance of such a signal is discretionary, and a city or county cannot be held liable for mere failure to perform such an act. McLaughlin v. City of Roswell, 161 Ga. App. 759, 289 S.E.2d 18 (1982).

Trial court properly granted summary judgment to a city on a parent's negligence claim against the city stemming from a child's serious automobile accident at a known dangerous intersection that was inappropriately signaled because the city was immune from suit as the issue of whether to install a traffic signal at the intersection was a discretionary act, entitling the city to sovereign immunity; further, a successful tax referendum to fund a new traffic light did not create a duty to install a traffic light at the intersection before completing other projects. Riggins v. City of St. Marys, 264 Ga. App. 95, 589 S.E.2d 691 (2003).

Failure to maintain stop sign in a visible condition. - Driver's allegations of negligence against a city for negligent maintenance of a stop sign, which was allegedly obscured by foliage, were subject to summary judgment based on the city's sovereign immunity pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-33-1(b). The driver's nuisance claim was barred because the driver failed to show the city's awareness of a problem with the stop sign. Albertson v. City of Jesup, 312 Ga. App. 246, 718 S.E.2d 4 (2011), cert. denied, No. S12C0398, 2012 Ga. LEXIS 245 (Ga. 2012).

Failure to maintain drainage culvert. - Summary judgment was granted in favor of a city upon a father's claim of negligence under O.C.G.A. § 32-4-93(a) because: (1) there was no showing that the city had a legal duty to expand the culvert pipe in which the father's son drowned, to widen the shoulder of the street, or to erect a guardrail as no statute required the city to take these actions, and the city's construction code did not impose a duty with regard to the culvert; (2) there was no evidence that the city negligently maintained the culvert; and (3) the city had no actual or constructive notice of flooding problems near the culvert or of defects in the culvert. Walden v. City of Hawkinsville, F.3d (M.D. Ga. Sept. 21, 2005).

No discretionary nonfeasance on the part of the city. - Grant of summary judgment in favor of the city in a wrongful-death action was improper because there was evidence that the decedent had to walk in the same direction as the truck that struck the decedent was traveling; thus, there was an inference of causation. That specification of negligence was an act of misfeasance, for which the city might have been held liable, rather than discretionary nonfeasance, for which the city could not have been held liable pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-33-2. Butler v. Carlisle, 299 Ga. App. 815, 683 S.E.2d 882 (2009), cert. denied, No. S10C0052, 2010 Ga. LEXIS 155 (Ga. 2010), overruled on other grounds by Mercer Univ. v. Stofer, 830 S.E.2d 169, 2019 Ga. LEXIS 436 (Ga. 2019).

County was under no duty to build bridge across creek which under normal circumstances was safe to ford and therefore not liable for death of car occupants who drowned when creek flooded over ford as car was passing over the ford. Dollar v. Haralson County, 704 F.2d 1540 (11th Cir.), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 963, 104 S. Ct. 399, 78 L. Ed. 2d 341 (1983).

Sewage back up. - Trial court erred by granting summary judgment to a city on a property owner's nuisance claim because evidence existed that the property had been subjected to repeated flooding and that the city had notice of the problem, creating a jury issue as to whether the city had created a nuisance by failing to install a back flow preventer as the city had done for other properties. J. N. Legacy Group v. City of Dallas, 322 Ga. App. 475, 745 S.E.2d 721 (2013).

Failure to construct barrier on top of retaining wall. - In a case in which the plaintiff fell over an 18-foot retaining wall, which had no barrier on top, the trial court erred in denying the city's motion for a directed verdict because no statute or ordinance required the city to construct such a barrier. City of Alpharetta v. Hamby, 352 Ga. App. 511, 835 S.E.2d 366 (2019).

Demolition of abandoned house. - Trial court erred in not granting a city's motion to dismiss the negligence claims against the city because the city was exercising a governmental function when the city demolished an abandoned house which was claimed to be a nuisance; therefore, the city was entitled to sovereign immunity on those claims. City of Atlanta v. Durham, 324 Ga. App. 563, 751 S.E.2d 172 (2013).

Cited in City of Dublin v. Hobbs, 218 Ga. 108, 126 S.E.2d 655 (1962); Phillips v. Town of Fort Oglethorpe, 118 Ga. App. 62, 162 S.E.2d 771 (1968); Hancock v. City of Dalton, 131 Ga. App. 178, 205 S.E.2d 470 (1974); Bowen v. Little, 139 Ga. App. 176, 228 S.E.2d 159 (1976); Mayor of Savannah v. Palmerio, 242 Ga. 419, 249 S.E.2d 224 (1978); Banks v. City of Brunswick, 529 F. Supp. 695 (S.D. Ga. 1981); City of Atlanta v. Chambers, 205 Ga. App. 834, 424 S.E.2d 19 (1992).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 57 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal, County, School, and State Tort Liability, § 56 et seq.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 28. 63 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 882, 887.

ALR. - Liability of municipal corporation for tort of officer or employee of water department, 28 A.L.R. 822; 54 A.L.R. 1497.

Commission and other modern forms of municipal government as affecting liability of municipality for torts, 30 A.L.R. 473.

Liability of municipality as affected by license issued by municipal officer, 42 A.L.R. 1208.

Rule of municipal immunity from liability for torts pertaining to exercise of governmental functions as available to municipal lessee or concessioner, 57 A.L.R. 560.

Liability of municipality where sewer originally of ample size has become inadequate by growth or development of territory, 70 A.L.R. 1347.

Liability of municipality for injury due to defective catch-basin covers, and the like, maintained in street in connection with drainage or sewer system, 71 A.L.R. 753.

Applicability to federal courts of state constitutional or statutory provisions regarding liability of county or other political subdivision to suit, 86 A.L.R. 1019.

Power of legislature to impose, or municipality to assume, liability for acts of officials or employees pertaining to governmental functions, 89 A.L.R. 394.

Liability of municipal corporation for its own misfeasance or nonfeasance, as distinguished from misfeasance or nonfeasance of officer or employee, 102 A.L.R. 656.

Liability of municipality because of misappropriation, diversion, or withholding of funds collected by or paid to it on account of special assessment against property for improvements, 107 A.L.R. 1354.

Liability of municipality for damage to person or property due to hydrant, 113 A.L.R. 661.

Responsibility for injury or damage by or to W.P.A. worker or other workman employed as a means of reducing unemployment, 120 A.L.R. 1148.

Municipal immunity from liability for torts, 120 A.L.R. 1376; 60 A.L.R.2d 1198.

Constitutionality of statute which relieves municipality from liability for torts, 124 A.L.R. 350.

Lease by municipality of property intended for use and benefit of public as affecting its duty and responsibility in respect of the manner and conditions of operation and maintenance of the property by the lessee, 129 A.L.R. 1163.

Liability of municipal corporations for injuries due to conditions in parks, 142 A.L.R. 1340.

Remedy available against invalid judgment in favor of United States, state, or other governmental unit immune to suit, 163 A.L.R. 244.

Liability of municipality for fire loss due to its failure to provide or maintain adequate water supply or pressure, 163 A.L.R. 348.

Civil rights and liabilities as affected by failure to comply with regulations as to registration of automobile or motorcycle or licensing of operation, 163 A.L.R. 1375.

Liability of municipality or other governmental subdivision in connection with flood-protection measures, 5 A.L.R.2d 57.

Liability of municipality for damage caused by fall of tree or limb, 14 A.L.R.2d 186.

Tort liability of municipality or other governmental unit in connection with destruction of weeds and the like, 34 A.L.R.2d 1210.

Liability of municipality for injuries resulting from fall or slipping on debris or litter on outdoor stairway, 47 A.L.R.2d 1086.

Municipal immunity from liability for torts, 60 A.L.R.2d 1198.

Municipality's liability arising from negligence or other wrongful act in carrying out construction or repair of sewers and drains, 61 A.L.R.2d 874.

Suability, and liability, for torts, of public housing authority, 61 A.L.R.2d 1246.

Liability of municipality for injuries resulting from falling or slipping on defective outdoor stairway or steps, 92 A.L.R.2d 469.

Municipal liability for personal injury or death under mob violence or antilynching statutes, 26 A.L.R.3d 1142.

Municipal liability for property damage under mob violence statutes, 26 A.L.R.3d 1198.

Liability of municipality or other governmental body on implied or quasi contract for value of property or work, 33 A.L.R.3d 1164.

Liability of public officer or body for harm done by prisoner permitted to escape, 44 A.L.R.3d 899.

Liability of municipality or other governmental unit for failure to provide police protection, 46 A.L.R.3d 1084.

Liability of governmental entity for issuance of permit for construction which caused or accelerated flooding, 62 A.L.R.3d 514.

Governmental liability from operation of zoo, 92 A.L.R.3d 832.

36-33-3. Liability for torts of police or other officers.

Statute text

A municipal corporation shall not be liable for the torts of policemen or other officers engaged in the discharge of the duties imposed on them by law.

History

(Civil Code 1895, § 744; Civil Code 1910, § 893; Code 1933, § 69-307.)

Annotations

History of section. - This Code section is derived from the decisions in Cook v. Mayor of Macon, 54 Ga. 468 (1875) and Wilson v. Mayor of Macon, 88 Ga. 455, 14 S.E. 710 (1892).

Cross references. - Liability of officers, agents, and others of counties, municipalities, for acts performed while fighting fires or performing duties at scene of emergencies, § 51-1-30.

Law reviews. - For article, "Personal Liability of State Officials Under State and Federal Law," see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 821 (1975). For article discussing origin and construction of Georgia statute concerning municipal liability for conduct of its officers, see 14 Ga. L. Rev. 239 (1980). For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007) and 60 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (2008).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Rule of nonliability generally. - Municipal corporation is not liable for the negligence of the municipality's officers and employees when acting in a governmental function. Banks v. City of Albany, 83 Ga. App. 640, 64 S.E.2d 93 (1951); Bagwell v. City of Gainesville, 106 Ga. App. 367, 126 S.E.2d 906 (1962).

No distinction between negligent and intentional torts. - Former Code 1933, §§ 69-301 and 69-307 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-33-1 and 36-33-3) did not suggest any intention to distinguish between torts of nonfeasance or misfeasance committed by negligence, and other torts committed corruptly, maliciously, willfully, or wantonly. Brown v. City of Union Point, 52 Ga. App. 212, 183 S.E. 78 (1935).

When liability arises. - Municipalities are liable for the acts of a municipalities' officers, agents, and servants only in instances as follows: (a) in the performance of any function when a statute specifically provides for such liability; (b) for neglect to perform or improper or unskillful performance of the municipalities' ministerial duties; and (c) for the performance of the municipalities' governmental functions when the same amounts to the taking or damaging of private property for public purposes without first making adequate compensation therefor, or the creation of a nuisance dangerous to the life and health of persons because of its proximity to the people in the enjoyment of the people's property. Greenway v. Thompson, 368 F. Supp. 387 (N.D. Ga. 1973).

This rule cannot be avoided or circumvented by allegations in the nature of conclusions seeking to assert as the basis for municipal liability the act of its placing the active tortfeasor in the position to commit the tort, nor by alleging that in employing the tortfeasor and retaining the tortfeasor on the payroll the municipality was guilty of maintaining a nuisance when the facts otherwise alleged affirmatively show that the real asserted basis of liability is on the theory of respondeat superior. City of Cumming v. Chastain, 97 Ga. App. 13, 102 S.E.2d 97 (1958).

Applicability of waiver of immunity provisions. - O.C.G.A. § 36-33-3 provides immunity only to governmental entities; consequently, it is a governmental immunity statute and is subject to the waiver of immunity provision of O.C.G.A. § 33-24-51(b). Ekarika v. City of East Point, 204 Ga. App. 731, 420 S.E.2d 391 (1992).

Municipality can waive governmental immunity. - In a negligence action against a city by plaintiffs injured in a collision with an on-duty police officer, the city's purchase of a general liability insurance policy covering claims in excess of $250,000 waived the city's sovereign immunity to the limits of the policy; since the city did not have a self-insurance plan, participate in any sort of insurance fund or pool, or set aside funds for the payment of liability claims, plaintiffs could recover only damages exceeding the $250,000 threshold. McLemore v. City Council, 212 Ga. 862, 443 S.E.2d 505 (1994).

In the absence of waiver of the immunity afforded by O.C.G.A. § 36-33-3, there can be no municipal liability for a claim based on allegedly reckless conduct by police. Williams v. Solomon, 242 Ga. App. 807, 531 S.E.2d 734 (2000).

Notice of powers implied. - In dealing with public agents, every person must take notice of the extent of their power at the person's peril. Laing v. Mayor of Americus, 86 Ga. 756, 13 S.E. 107 (1891).

City cannot ratify. - Municipality cannot ratify the unlawful acts of the municipality's subordinate officials done in the pursuance of the municipality's governmental functions. Davis v. City of Rome, 23 Ga. App. 188, 98 S.E. 231 (1919).

Federal civil rights actions. - Supremacy clause of U.S. Const. prevents state court from construing federal rule to permit state immunity defense to claim made under 42 U.S.C. § 1983, the Civil Rights Act of 1871. Davis v. City of Roswell, 250 Ga. 8, 295 S.E.2d 317 (1982), cert. denied, 475 U.S. 1122, 106 S. Ct. 1640, 90 L. Ed. 2d 185 (1986).

When a governing body has worked constitutional deprivation of a citizen pursuant to an impermissible or corrupt policy which is intentional and deliberate, a cause of action is accrued under the federal Civil Rights Act in spite of the doctrine of sovereign immunity. City of Cave Spring v. Mason, 252 Ga. 3, 310 S.E.2d 892 (1984).

Acts of mayor in setting bond. - City is not liable in damages because the city's mayor required of a person charged with a violation of a city ordinance, a larger bond for the person's appearance than the law authorized, even if the failure of such person to give bond and the person's consequent confinement were occasioned thereby. Gray v. Mayor of Griffin, 111 Ga. 361, 36 S.E. 792 (1900).

Wrongful refusal of bail. - City was not liable in damages because mayor, as judge of city's court for the trial of ordinance violations, wrongfully refused to allow bail to an alleged offender and wrongfully directed a police officer to commit the offender to jail, since the offender was imprisoned until released by a habeas corpus proceeding, nor did the appearance of the mayor or an attorney for the municipality in resistance of the habeas corpus constitute a ratification by the municipality of these alleged illegal acts by the municipality's officers, so as to render the municipality liable therefore. Brown v. City of Union Point, 52 Ga. App. 212, 183 S.E. 78 (1935).

Failure to provide police protection. - When a failure to provide police protection is alleged, there can only be no liability based on a municipality's duty to protect the general public. However, when there is a special relationship between the individual and the municipality which sets the individual apart from the general public and engenders a special duty owed to that individual, the municipality may be subject to liability for the nonfeasance of the municipality's police department. Benning Constr. Co. v. Dykes Paving & Constr. Co., Inc., 263 Ga. 16, 426 S.E.2d 564 (1993).

Acts of police officers. - When a police officer was acting as an officer of the city at the time of a homicide, the city would not be liable for the reason that the police officer was in the discharge of a governmental function, and in such case recovery cannot be had against the city. Pounds v. Central of Ga. Ry., 142 Ga. 415, 83 S.E. 96 (1914).

Doctrine of governmental immunity protected the city from liability for the actions of the city's employees, including the police officer who arrested the individual for criminal trespass in the discharge of the officer's lawful duties, and, thus, the city was protected by that immunity from the arrested individual's claims against the city. Reese v. City of Atlanta, 261 Ga. App. 761, 583 S.E.2d 584 (2003).

In a tort action for personal injuries and property damage arising from an auto collision filed against a city and the city's police officer, the trial court erred in granting a city summary judgment as: (1) O.C.G.A. § 40-6-6(d)(2) did not apply; and (2) the city waived the city's sovereign immunity to the extent that the city purchased liability coverage to cover the officer's actions in operating that officer's police car. But, the trial court properly granted summary judgment to the officer, given that the officer was engaged in a discretionary function of responding to an emergency situation at the time the accident at issue occurred. Weaver v. City of Statesboro, 288 Ga. App. 32, 653 S.E.2d 765 (2007), cert. denied, No. S08C0421, 2008 Ga. LEXIS 221 (Ga. 2008).

In an arrestee's state law claims, a city was not liable for actions of the city's police officers because the officers engaged in protected ministerial functions. Lavassani v. City of Canton, 760 F. Supp. 2d 1346 (N.D. Ga. 2010).

Knowingly maintaining violent police officer. - It is unclear whether municipal immunity continues to encompass a nuisance claim against a city for knowingly maintaining a violent police officer. Brooks v. Scheib, 813 F.2d 1191 (11th Cir. 1987).

Municipal corporation is not liable for illegal arrest of a person by the municipal corporation's police officers. Cook v. Mayor of Macon, 54 Ga. 468 (1875); Gray v. Mayor of Griffin, 111 Ga. 361, 36 S.E. 792 (1900).

Drunken driving arrest. - Town marshal, in arresting and placing in town lockup a person for drunken driving, would be engaged in discharge of duty imposed on the marshal by law. Archer v. City of Austell, 68 Ga. App. 493, 23 S.E.2d 512 (1942).

Collision by police officer. - Trial court erred in granting the city's motion for judgment on the pleadings since the city could have been vicariously liable to plaintiff for the officer's alleged negligent act of driving the officer's patrol car into plaintiff's vehicle up to the limits of the city's policy of motor vehicle liability. Ekarika v. City of East Point, 204 Ga. App. 731, 420 S.E.2d 391 (1992).

Claim for breach of an implied contract of bailment by a city in taking and holding plaintiff's motorcycle was not barred under the language of O.C.G.A § 36-33-3, which is restricted to tort claims. Harper v. Savannah Police Dep't, 179 Ga. App. 449, 346 S.E.2d 891 (1986).

Negligence of fire fighter. - Even if cutting a hole and leaving the hole in an exposed condition was negligence on the part of a fire fighter, the city was not liable in damages to a person injured in consequence of the negligence. Rogers v. City of Atlanta, 143 Ga. 153, 84 S.E. 555 (1915).

City not liable for jail conditions. - Because a city was immune from suit in performing the governmental function of maintaining the city jail, it could not be concluded as a matter of law, in a federal civil rights action against the city and the city's police officers, alleging that the physical conditions in the jail deprived the defendant of due process, that "adequate state remedies" existed. Lambert v. McFarland, 612 F. Supp. 1252 (N.D. Ga. 1984).

Acts of warden. - Even though sentence imposed by a recorder might have been wholly void, the city would not be liable for the tortious and illegal acts of a warden. Davis v. City of Rome, 23 Ga. App. 188, 98 S.E. 231 (1919).

Municipal corporation is not liable for injuries sustained by prisoner at hands of another confined in the same cell, notwithstanding police officer may have been guilty of wrong or negligence in confining the prisoner with intoxicated fellow-prisoner who was on that account violent and dangerous. Wilson v. Mayor of Macon, 88 Ga. 455, 14 S.E. 710 (1892).

City not liable for negligence in erecting prison. - In erecting and maintaining a city prison, a municipal corporation is exercising a purely governmental function, and is, therefore, not liable in damages to a person arrested and imprisoned therein by the municipality's police officers, for injuries sustained by the person, while so confined, by reason of the improper construction or negligent maintenance of such prison. Gray v. Mayor of Griffin, 111 Ga. 361, 36 S.E. 792 (1900).

Nonliability of railway company for wrongful killing by police officer. - When police officer of municipality, being paid by railway company to keep order at depot, wrongfully kills a passenger, the police officer is said to be a municipal officer, and the railway company is not liable in damages. Pounds v. Central of Ga. Ry., 142 Ga. 415, 83 S.E. 96 (1914).

Pleading failure to state claim sufficient. - Under notice pleading, an answer pleading a defense of failure to state a claim was minimally sufficient to give notice of substantive immunity defenses under either O.C.G.A. § 31-11-8 or O.C.G.A. § 36-33-3. Ramsey v. City of Forest Park, 204 Ga. App. 98, 418 S.E.2d 432 (1992).

Cited in Maddox v. City of Atlanta, 49 Ga. App. 791, 171 S.E. 573 (1933); Pitts v. City of Macon, 134 Ga. App. 467, 214 S.E.2d 720 (1975); Morin v. City of Valdosta, 140 Ga. App. 361, 231 S.E.2d 133 (1976); Tucker v. Thompson, 421 F. Supp. 297 (M.D. Ga. 1976); City of Atlanta v. Fry, 148 Ga. App. 269, 251 S.E.2d 90 (1978); Sellfors v. United States, 697 F.2d 1362 (11th Cir. 1983); City of Atlanta v. Gilmere, 252 Ga. 406, 314 S.E.2d 204 (1984); Acker v. City of Elberton, 176 Ga. App. 580, 336 S.E.2d 842 (1985), overruled on other grounds by West v. City of Albany, 2017 Ga. LEXIS 177 (Ga. 2017); Poss v. City of North Augusta, 205 Ga. App. 894, 424 S.E.2d 73 (1992); City of Atlanta v. Heard, 252 Ga. App. 179, 555 S.E.2d 849 (2001).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 201.

Excessive Force by Police Officer, 21 POF3d 685.

C.J.S. - 63 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 888, 894, 895, 910.

ALR. - Liability of municipal corporation for tort of officer or employee of water department, 24 A.L.R. 545; 28 A.L.R. 822; 54 A.L.R. 1497.

Liability of municipality as affected by license issued by municipal officer, 42 A.L.R. 1208.

Policemen as public officers, 84 A.L.R. 309; 156 A.L.R. 1356.

Validity of statute or ordinance vesting discretion in public officials without prescribing a rule of action, 92 A.L.R. 400.

Liability of municipality or other political unit for malicious prosecution, 103 A.L.R. 1512.

Death action against municipal corporation as subject to statute of limitations governing wrongful death actions or that governing actions against a municipality for injury to person or property, 53 A.L.R.2d 1068.

Municipal liability for personal injuries resulting from police officer's use of excessive force in performance of duty, 88 A.L.R.2d 1330.

Liability of municipal corporation for shooting of bystander by law enforcement officer attempting to enforce law, 76 A.L.R.3d 1176.

Liability of governmental unit or its officers for injury to innocent pedestrian or occupant of parked vehicle, or for damage to such vehicle, as result of police chase, 100 A.L.R.3d 815.

Immunity of public officer from liability for injuries caused by negligently released individual, 5 A.L.R.4th 773.

Municipal or state liability for injuries resulting from police roadblocks or commandeering of private vehicles, 19 A.L.R.4th 937.

Liability for failure of police response to emergency call, 39 A.L.R.4th 691.

Governmental tort liability for failure to provide police protection to specifically threatened crime victim, 46 A.L.R.4th 948.

36-33-4. Personal liability of councilmembers and other municipal officers.

Statute text

Members of the council and other officers of a municipal corporation shall be personally liable to one who sustains special damages as the result of any official act of such officers if done oppressively, maliciously, corruptly, or without authority of law.

History

(Civil Code 1895, § 752; Civil Code 1910, § 901; Code 1933, § 69-208.)

Annotations

History of section. - This Code section is derived from the decision in Pruden v. Love, 67 Ga. 190 (1881).

Cross references. - False arrest, false imprisonment, and malicious prosecution, T. 51, C. 7.

Law reviews. - For article, "Cities and Towns in Georgia: A Distinction with a Difference?," see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 385 (1963). For article, "Georgia Local Government Officers: Rights for Their Wrongs," see 13 Ga. L. Rev. 747 (1979). For article discussing origin and construction of Georgia law of personal liability for municipal officials, see 14 Ga. L. Rev. 239 (1980). For article, "Individual Liability in Georgia Local Government Law: The Haunting Hiatus of Hennessy," see 40 Mercer L. Rev. 27 (1988). For article, "Local Government Tort Liability: The Summer of '92," see 9 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 405 (1993).

For note discussing governmental immunity from tort liability in Georgia, see 5 Ga. St. B. J. 494 (1969).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

There are two conditions for the liability of commissions under this section, namely for the defendants to have acted contrary to a nondiscretionary, ministerial duty, and to have acted with malice. City of Hawkinsville v. Wilson & Wilson, Inc., 231 Ga. 110, 200 S.E.2d 262 (1973).

Effect of the provisions of former Code 1933, § 69-208 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-33-4) was to create liability against municipal officers under such conditions when the officers commit a tort, which as provided in former Code 1933, § 105-101 (see now O.C.G.A. § 51-1-1) was the unlawful violation of a private legal right. Davis v. Johnson, 92 Ga. App. 858, 90 S.E.2d 426 (1955).

Malice defined. - Malice may consist in a general disregard of the right consideration of mankind, directed by chance against the individual injured. Kitchens v. Jefferson County, 85 Ga. App. 902, 70 S.E.2d 527 (1952).

Special damages required - When plaintiff city council member failed to plead special damages in action against city manager and mayor's secretary for invasion of privacy based on taping of plaintiff's phone conversation with mayor, plaintiff failed to establish that plaintiff was entitled to proceed under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-4. Kennedy v. Johnson, 205 Ga. App. 220, 421 S.E.2d 746, cert. denied, 205 Ga. App. 900, 421 S.E.2d 746 (1992).

General damages recoverable. - Claim under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-4 is essentially a tort action, not one based on a regulatory restriction; thus, general as well as compensatory damages may be recovered. City of Buford v. Ward, 212 Ga. App. 752, 443 S.E.2d 279 (1994).
